Virginia statutes. Title 6.2. Financial Institutions and Services.
Article 10. Reserves.

§ 6.2-889.
Required reserves.

As used in this section, unless the context requires otherwise:“Demand deposits” means all deposits the payment of which can be legally required in less than 30 days.“Time deposits” means all deposits the payment of which cannot be legally required in less than 30 days.

Every bank shall maintain a reserve related to its demand deposits and to its time deposits. The reserve on:

Demand deposits shall consist of actual cash on hand and balances payable on demand, due from other solvent banks; and

Time deposits shall consist of actual cash on hand and balances payable on demand due from other solvent banks; provided that up to 100 percent of such reserve on time deposits may be in the form of short maturity general obligations of the United States, such maximum percentage to be fixed by the Commission.

The Commission shall by regulation establish from time to time the reserve requirements within the following limits:

On demand deposits: zero to 15 percent; and

On time deposits: zero to five percent.

The reserves required herein for each day shall be computed on the basis of average daily deposits covering a biweekly period, provided that shorter averaging periods may be fixed by regulation of the Commission.

Nothing herein shall be construed to relieve any bank which is a member of the Federal Reserve System from maintaining a reserve fund in accordance with the requirements applicable to such member banks.

History.

Code 1950, § 6-52; 1966, c. 584, §
6.1-69; 1976, c. 658; 1981, c. 65; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-890.
Preferences by pledging assets.

No bank shall give preference to any depositor or creditor by pledging the assets of such bank, except as otherwise authorized by subsection B, or except to secure deposits of trust funds made pursuant to the provisions of §

6.2-1005

or

6.2-1057

.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection A, any bank:

May deposit securities for the purpose of securing deposits of:

The United States government and its agencies;

The Commonwealth, any other state where the bank has a branch office, or any agency or political subdivision thereof;

Insolvent national bank funds as permitted under 12 U.S.C. § 192;

Proceeds of sale of United States obligations as permitted under 31 U.S.C. § 771; and

Bankruptcy funds deposited under the provisions of 11 U.S.C. § 345;

May deposit securities for the purpose of securing sureties on surety bonds furnished to secure deposits listed in subdivision 1, or may, in lieu of depositing such securities to secure deposits pursuant to subdivision 1 b, by its board of directors, adopt a resolution before such public funds are deposited therein, to the effect that, in the event of the insolvency or failure of such bank, such public funds thereafter deposited therein shall, in the distribution of the assets of such bank, be paid in full before any other depositors shall be paid deposits thereafter made therein. The adoption of such resolution shall be deemed to constitute an obligation binding on such bank;

Is authorized to pledge its assets as security for amounts of borrowed money which shall not, without the approval of the Commission given in advance in writing, exceed in the aggregate the amount of the capital, surplus, and undivided profits of such bank actually paid in or earned and remaining undiminished by losses or otherwise. The amount of assets pledged for the security of such a loan shall not, without such approval, exceed 150 percent of the amount borrowed. No loan in excess of the amount so permitted made to any such bank shall be invalid or illegal as to the lender, even though made without the consent of the Commission. Rediscounting with or without guarantee or endorsement of notes, drafts, bills of exchange, or loans is hereby authorized and shall not be limited by the terms of this section, and shall not be considered as borrowed money within the meaning of this section;

Is authorized to borrow from a Federal Reserve Bank or a Federal Home Loan Bank and to rediscount with and sell to a Federal Reserve Bank or a Federal Home Loan Bank any and all notes, drafts, bills of exchange, acceptances, and other securities, and to give security for all money so borrowed and for all liabilities incurred by the discount of such notes, drafts, bills of exchange and other securities without restriction in like manner and to the same extent as national banks may lawfully do under the acts of Congress and regulations of the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System and the Federal Housing Finance Board; and

Is authorized to pledge its assets in connection with qualified financial contracts, which transactions shall be governed by this subdivision and not subdivision 3. The amount of assets pledged for obligations under such contracts shall not exceed 150 percent of the amount of the obligations, without the consent of the Commission, and the qualified financial contract shall be in writing and approved by the board of directors of such bank or an appropriate committee, which approval shall be reflected in the minutes of such board or committee. At the time any qualified financial contracts consisting of retail repurchase agreements are sold by a state bank, the market value of the underlying security must be at least equal to the amount of the aggregate purchase price paid by the purchasers of the retail repurchase agreements. As used in this subdivision, “qualified financial contract” means a qualified financial contract as defined in 12 U.S.C. § 1821(e)(8)(D)(i), as the same may be amended, and any contract or transaction that the Commissioner determines to be a qualified financial contract for purposes of this section.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 6-64, 6-65, 6-66; 1966, c. 584, §§ 6.1-78, 6.1-79, 6.1-80; 1974, c. 665; 1982, cc. 112, 411; 1989, c. 376; 1993, c. 182; 1994, c. 7; 1996, c. 306; 2010, c. 794; 2013, c. 205.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 205, in subdivision B 1 b, substituted “any other state where the bank has a branch office, or any agency or political subdivision thereof” for “its agencies, and its political subdivisions”; in subdivision B 1 e, substituted “§ 345” for “§ 15345”; and in subdivision B 2, substituted “pursuant to subdivision 1 b” for “of political subdivisions of the Commonwealth.”

§ 6.2-891.
Perfection of certain security interests.

When securities are sold by a bank subject to an obligation of repurchase, any security interest or interest of ownership therein may be perfected:

As specified by Title 8.8A or Title 8.9A;

By designation to the person holding physical custody thereof, which shall include a person keeping the master records, in case of securities identified by book entry only, that certain securities identified by serial number or dollar amount are held for the benefit of third parties other than the bank, who may, but need not, be identified by name; or

By physical separation on the premises of the bank in a separate drawer, compartment, or other facility. The bank may, from time to time, instruct any third party holding such securities that the previously identified securities or an amount of such securities previously identified as pledged or belonging to third parties have been released from such pledge by payment of all or part of the amount due, or have been repurchased. The records of the bank shall identify the persons who are pledgees or owners of such securities. Book-entry securities held in a bank’s customer-safekeeping account, used for the same purpose, at the Federal Reserve Bank, notwithstanding that other customer securities are held in the same account, shall be deemed in compliance with subdivision 2, provided such securities are identified in the bank’s records as required by this section.

History.

1982, c. 429, § 6.1-81; 1983, c. 250; 1986, c. 320; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-892.
Federal deposit insurance a credit towards certain required bonds.

If a bank is required by the laws of the Commonwealth to furnish or deposit a surety bond or securities as security for the payment of any funds deposited in the bank, other than funds received or held in the trust department of the bank awaiting investment or distribution, the amount of the penalty of such bond or the amount of such securities shall be as required by law, less the amount of such deposit that, to the satisfaction of the body, officer, or other person responsible for seeing that a surety bond or amount of securities is furnished as security for such deposit, is insured under the provisions of § 12-b of the Federal Reserve Act, as amended, or any amendments thereto.

History.

Code 1950, § 6-70; 1966, c. 584, § 6.1-83; 2010, c. 794.